fr: Variété de citron vert: Calamondin; Citron vert du désert; Citron caviar; Combava (Makrut); Lime du Mexique; Lime de Tahiti (perse); Lime Rangpur; Lime douce (Mosambi); Yuzu; Autre
el: Ποικιλία λάιμ: Καλαμάνσι; Μοσχολέμονο της ερήμου; Finger lime; Kaffir (Makrut) lime; Key (Μεξικάνικο) lime; Περσικό (Ταϊτής) lime; Μοσχολέμονο Ρανγκπούρ; Γλυκό μοσχολέμονο (Mosambi); Yuzu; Άλλο
ru: Сорт лайма: Каламанси; Пустынный лайм; Пальчиковый лайм; Каффир-лайм (макрут); Мексиканский лайм; Персидский лайм (Таити); Рангпурский лайм; Сладкий лайм (Мосамби); Юдзу; Другое
da: Limevariant: Calamansi; Ørkenlime; Fingerlime; Kaffirlime (makrut); Key lime (mexicansk lime); Persisk lime (tahiti); Rangpurlime; Sød lime (mosambi); Yuzu; Andet
vi: Giống chanh: Quất (Calamansi); Chanh sa mạc; Chanh ngón tay; Chanh sáp (Makrut); Chanh Key (Mexico); Chanh Ba Tư (Tahiti); Chanh Rangpur; Chanh ngọt (Mosambi); Chanh Yuzu; Khác
sv: Limesort: Calamondin; Ökenlime; Fingerlime; Kaffir (makrut) lime; Key lime (mexikansk lime); Persisk (Tahiti) lime; Rangpurlime; Söt (Mosambi) lime; Yuzu; Övrigt
pt-BR: Modalidade de limão: Calamondim; Limão-do-deserto; Limão-caviar; Limão Kaffir (Makrut); Limão Key (Mexicano); Limão persa (Taiti); Limão-cravo; Limão-doce (Mosambi); Yuzu; Outro
es: Variedad de lima: Calamansi; Lima del desierto; Lima dedo; Lima kaffir (Makrut); Lima sutil (mexicana); Lima persa (Tahití); Lima de Rangpur; Lima dulce (Mosambi); Yuzu; Otro
th: พันธุ์มะนาว: คาลาแมนซี่; มะนาวทะเลทราย; มะนาวคาเวียร์ (มะนาวนิ้ว); มะกรูด; มะนาวคีย์ (เม็กซิกัน); มะนาวเปอร์เซีย (ตาฮิติ); มะนาวรังปุระ; มะนาวหวาน (โมซัมบี); ยูซุ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 肢體種類: 四季橘 (Calamansi); 沙漠金柑; 手指檸檬; 馬蜂橙 (Kaffir/Makrut lime); 墨西哥青檸 (Key lime); 波斯青檸 (大溪地青檸); 黎檬 (Rangpur lime); 甜檸檬 (Mosambi); 日本柚子 (Yuzu); 其他
nl: Limoenvariëteit: Calamansi; Woestijnlimoen; Vingerlimoen; Kaffirlimoen (Djeroek poeroet); Key (Mexicaanse) limoen; Perzische (Tahiti) limoen; Rangpurlimoen; Zoete limoen (Mosambi); Yuzu; Overige
sl-SI: Sorta limete: Kalamansi; Puščavska limeta; Prstasta limeta; Kafirska (Makrut) limeta; Key (mehiška) limeta; Perzijska (tahitijska) limeta; Rangpurska limeta; Sladka (Mosambi) limeta; Juzu; Drugo
hr-HR: Sorta limete: Kalamansi; Pustinjska limeta; Prstasta limeta; Kefirska (Makrut) limeta; Meksička (Key) limeta; Perzijska (Tahiti) limeta; Rangpur limeta; Slatka (Mosambi) limeta; Yuzu; Ostalo
tr: Limon çeşidi: Kalamansi; Çöl misket limonu; Parmak misket limonu; Kaffir (Makrut) misket limonu; Key (Meksika) misket limonu; Tahiti misket limonu; Rangpur misket limonu; Tatlı (Mosambi) misket limonu; Yuzu; Diğer
cs: Odrůda limety: Calamansi; Pouštní limetka; Kaviárová limetka; Kafírová limetka (Makrut); Mexická limetka (Key); Perská limetka (Tahitská); Rangpur limetka; Sladká limetka (Mosambi); Yuzu; Jiné
it: Varietà di lime: Calamondino; Lime del deserto; Finger lime; Combava (Makrut); Lime Key (messicano); Lime persiano (Tahiti); Lime di Rangpur; Lime dolce (Mosambi); Yuzu; Altro
de: Auswahl an Limetten: Calamansi; Wüstenlimette; Fingerlimette; Kaffir- (Makrut-) Limette; Echte (Mexikanische) Limette; Gewöhnliche (Tahiti-) Limette; Rangpur-Limette; Süße (Mosambi-) Limette; Yuzu; Sonstige
zh-CN: 酸橙品种: 四季橘; 沙漠青柠; 指橙; 箭叶橙 (Makrut); 墨西哥青柠 (Key Lime); 波斯（塔希提）青柠; 黎檬; 甜青柠 (Mosambi); 柚子 (Yuzu); 其他
fi: Limettilajike: Kalamondiini; Aavikkolimetti; Sormilimetti; Kafferilimetti (makrut); Key-limetti (meksikonlimetti); Persianlimetti (Tahiti); Rangpurinlimetti; Makealimetti (Mosambi); Juzu; Muu
pt-PT: Variedade de lima: Calamansi; Lima do deserto; Lima caviar; Lima kaffir (Makrut); Lima do México; Lima persa (Tahiti); Lima-cantão; Lima doce (Mosambi); Yuzu; Outro
bg-BG: Сорт лайм: Каламанси; Пустинен лайм; Фингър лайм; Кафир лайм (Макрут); Кий лайм (мексикански лайм); Персийски лайм (таитянски лайм); Рангпурски лайм; Сладък лайм (Мосамби); Юзу; Друго
pl: Odmiana limonki: Calamansi; Limonka pustynna; Limonka palczasta; Limonka kaffir (Makrut); Limonka Key (meksykańska); Limonka perska (Tahiti); Limonka Rangpur; Słodka limetka (Mosambi); Yuzu; Inne
ro-RO: Soi de lămâie verde: Calamansi; Lămâie de deșert; Finger lime (lămâie caviar); Lămâie Kaffir (Makrut); Lămâie Key (Mexicană); Lămâie persană (Tahiti); Lămâie Rangpur; Lămâie dulce (Mosambi); Yuzu; Altele
lt-LT: Žaliųjų citrinų veislė: Kalamondinas; Dykrų žalioji citrina; Pirštuotoji žalioji citrina; Kafirų (Makrut) žalioji citrina; Tikroji (Meksikos) žalioji citrina; Persinė (Taitiška) žalioji citrina; Rangpūro žalioji citrina; Saldžioji žalioji citrina (Mosambi); Kvapusis citrinmedis (Yuzu); Kita
hu: Zöldcitrom fajtája: Kalamondin; Sivatagi zöldcitrom; Ujjcitrom; Kaffir (Makrut) zöldcitrom; Key (mexikói) zöldcitrom; Perzsa (Tahiti) zöldcitrom; Rangpur zöldcitrom; Édes (Mosambi) zöldcitrom; Yuzu; Egyéb
en: Lime variety: Calamansi; Desert lime; Finger lime; Kaffir (Makrut) lime; Key (Mexican) lime; Persian (Tahiti) lime; Rangpur lime; Sweet (Mosambi) lime; Yuzu; Other
ja: ライムの種類: カラマンシー; デザートライム; フィンガーライム; カフィア (マクルット) ライム; キー (メキシカン) ライム; ペルシャ (タヒチ) ライム; ラングプールライム; スウィート (モサンビ) ライム; ゆず; その他
sk-SK: Odroda lipy: Calamansi; Púštna limetka; Kaviárová limetka; Kafírová (Makrut) limetka; Mexická (Key) limetka; Perzská (tahitská) limetka; Rangpurská limetka; Sladká limetka (Mosambi); Yuzu; Iné
ko: 라임 품종: 깔라만시; 데저트 라임; 핑거 라임; 카피르(마크루트) 라임; 키(멕시칸) 라임; 페르시안(타히티) 라임; 랑푸르 라임; 스위트(모잠비) 라임; 유자; 기타
nb: Limevariant: Calamondin; Ørkenlime; Fingerlime; Kaffir-lime (Makrut); Key-lime (meksikansk); Persisk lime (Tahiti); Rangpur-lime; Søt lime (Mosambi); Yuzu; Annet